Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1025
Basic allowable
growth rate.

The basic allowable growth
rate for general fund expenditures other than expenditures for special education
shall be the base limitation established under section 77-3446. The budget authority for special education
for all classes of school districts shall be the actual anticipated expenditures
for special education subject to the approval of the state board. Such budget
authority and funds generated pursuant to such budget authority shall be used
only for special education expenditures.

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 16;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 81;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 86;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 203;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 174;

Laws 1995, LB 613, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 299, § 28;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-3816;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 671;

Laws 1998, LB 989, § 9;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 30;

Laws 2003, LB 540, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 20.

Retirement expenditures, not exempt from limitations, see section 79-977.